California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) The appointment of the executive director is subject to confirmation by the Senate, and the time limits prescribed in Section 1774 of the Government Code for Senate confirmation and for service in office are applicable to the appointment.

(d) This section applies to persons appointed as the executive director on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 6.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.

(a) The board shall appoint a general counsel of the State Bar to serve as the chief legal advisor to the board on issues not related to attorney discipline.

(b) The board shall appoint a lawyer admitted to practice in California to serve as general counsel of the State Bar. The general counsel shall be appointed for a term of four years and may be reappointed for additional four-year terms. The general counsel shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The general counsel shall not engage in private practice. The State Bar shall notify the Senate Committee on Rules and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Judiciary within seven days of the dismissal or hiring of a
 general counsel.

(c) The appointment of the general counsel is subject to confirmation by the Senate, and the time limits prescribed in Section 1774 of the Government Code for Senate confirmation and for service in office are applicable to the appointment.

(d) This section applies to persons appointed general counsel on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 7.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6013.1.

(a) The Supreme Court shall appoint five attorney members of the board pursuant to a process that the Supreme Court may prescribe. These attorney members shall serve for a term of four years and may be reappointed by the Supreme Court for one additional term only.

(b) The Supreme Court shall fill any vacancy in the term of, and make any reappointment of, any appointed attorney member.

(c) When making appointments to the board, the Supreme Court should consider appointing attorneys that represent the following categories: legal services; small firm or solo practitioners; historically underrepresented groups, including consideration of race, ethnicity, gender, and sexual orientation; and legal
 academics. In making appointments to the board, the Supreme Court should also consider geographic distribution, years of practice, particularly attorneys who are within the first five years of practice or 36 years of age and under, and participation in voluntary local or state bar activities.

(d) The State Bar shall be responsible for carrying out the administrative responsibilities related to the appointment process described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 405, Sec. 2.   (SB 253)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6013.3.

(a) One attorney member of the board shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and one attorney member of the board shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(b) An attorney member appointed pursuant to this section shall serve for a term of four years. Vacancies shall be filled for the remainder of the term. An appointed attorney member may be reappointed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 422, Sec. 10.   (SB 36)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6013.5.

(a) Effective January 1, 2018, a maximum of six members of the board shall be members of the public who have never been licensees of the State Bar or admitted to practice before any court in the United States.

(b) Each of these members shall serve for a term of four years. Vacancies shall be filled for the remainder of the term.

(c) Effective January 1, 2018, one public member shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and one public member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(d) Four public members shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to the confirmation of the Senate.

(e) Each respective appointing authority shall fill any vacancy in and make any reappointment to each respective office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 16.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6013.5.5.

Subdivision (c) of Section 450 and Sections 450.2 to 450.6, inclusive, shall apply to public members appointed or reappointed on or after January 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 2.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6013.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any full-time employee of any public agency who serves as a member of the Board of Trustees of the State Bar of California shall not suffer any loss of rights, promotions, salary increases, retirement benefits, tenure, or other job-related benefits, which he or she would otherwise have been entitled to receive.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), any public agency which employs a person who serves as a member of the Board of Trustees of the State Bar of California may reduce the employee’s salary, but no other right or job-related benefit, pro rata to the extent that the employee does not work the number of hours required
 by statute or written regulation to be worked by other employees of the same grade in any particular pay period and the employee does not claim available leave time. The employee shall be afforded the opportunity to perform job duties during other than regular working hours if such a work arrangement is practical and would not be a burden to the public agency.

(c) The Legislature finds that service as a member of the Board of Trustees of the State Bar of California by a person employed by a public agency is in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 417, Sec. 18.   (SB 163)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6015.

No person is eligible for attorney membership on the board unless both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) He or she is an active licensee of the State Bar.

(b) Either:

(1) Prior to October 31, 2020, if elected, he or she maintains his or her principal office for the practice of law within the State Bar district from which he or she is elected.

(2) If appointed by the Supreme Court or the Legislature, he or she maintains his or her principal office for the practice of law within the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 17.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6016.

(a) The term of office of each attorney member of the board shall be four years. Vacancies shall be filled for the remainder of the term.

(b) The board of trustees may provide by rule for an interim board to act in the place and stead of the board when because of vacancies during terms of office there is less than a quorum of the board.

(c) The time served during the remainder of a midterm vacancy by any member appointed to fill that vacancy shall not count toward any term limits for the member filling the vacancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 419, Sec. 2.   (AB 2958)   Effective September 18, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6016.2.

(a) Each appointing authority may remove from office at any time any member of the board appointed by that authority for continued neglect of duties required by law, or for incompetence or unprofessional or dishonorable conduct.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation or restriction on the power of the appointing authority conferred on the appointing authority by any other provision of law to remove any member of the board.

(c) As used in this section, “appointing authority” means the person or entity with authority to make an appointment to the board as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 227, Sec. 2.   (AB 3279)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6019.

Each place upon the board for which a member is to be appointed shall for the purposes of the appointment be deemed a separate office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 422, Sec. 15.   (SB 36)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6020.

The officers of the State Bar are a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 19.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6021.

(a) The selection of the chair and vice chair of the board shall be made by appointment of the Supreme Court.

(b) The chair
 and the vice chair shall
 each be appointed for a term not to exceed two years. The chair and vice chair shall assume the duties of their respective offices at the conclusion of the September meeting following their appointment. The chair and vice chair shall not serve more than two terms, except that a chair or vice chair who is appointed to fill a vacancy for the balance of a term is eligible to serve two full terms in addition to the remainder of the term for which they were appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 8.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6023.

The officers of the State Bar shall continue in office until their successors are appointed or selected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6024.

The chair shall preside at all meetings of the State Bar and of the board, and in the event of his or her absence or inability to act, the vice chair shall preside.

Other duties of the chair and the vice chair, and the duties of the secretary, shall be such as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 22.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.

Subject to the laws of this state, the board may formulate and declare rules and regulations necessary or expedient for the carrying out of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 698, Sec. 4.   (SB 176)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6026.7.

(a) The State Bar is subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and all meetings of the State Bar are subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act shall not apply to the Judicial Nominees Evaluation Commission or the State Bar Court.

(c) In addition to the grounds authorized in the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act, a closed session may be held for those meetings, or portions thereof, relating to any of the following:

(1) Appeals from decisions of the Board
 of Legal Specialization refusing to certify or recertify an applicant or suspending or revoking a specialist’s certificate.

(2) The preparation of examination materials, the approval, the grading, or the security of test administration of examinations for certification of a specialist.

(3) The preparation of examination materials, the approval, the grading, or the security of test administration of the California Bar Examination or the First-Year Law Students’ Examination.

(4) Matters related to the Committee of Bar Examiners’ consideration of moral character, including allegations of criminal or professional misconduct, competence, or physical or mental health of an individual, requests by applicants for testing accommodations in connection with an application for admission to practice law, or appeals of the
 Committee of Bar Examiners’ determinations.

(5) Information about a law school’s operations that constitutes a trade secret as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code.

(6) Matters related to the board’s consideration of waiving confidentiality related to records of disciplinary proceedings under subdivision (c) of Section 6086.1.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11125.7 of the Government Code, the State Bar shall accept public comment in open session on all matters that are agendized for discussion or decision by the board of trustees, whether in an open or a closed session.

(e) The Committee of Bar Examiners shall not be considered an advisory board, advisory commission, advisory committee, advisory subcommittee, or
 similar multimember advisory body, as described in Section 11123.5 of the Government Code, for purposes of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 405, Sec. 3.   (SB 253)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6026.11.

The State Bar is subject to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and all public records and writings of the State Bar are subject to the California Public Records Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 13.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6027.

Special meetings of the State Bar may be held at such times and places as the board provides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

6028.

(a) The board may make appropriations and disbursements from the funds of the State Bar to pay all necessary expenses for effectuating the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), no member of the board shall receive any other compensation than his or her necessary expenses connected with the performance of his or her duties as a member of the board.

(c) Public members of the board appointed pursuant to the provisions of Section 6013.5 and public members of the examining committee appointed pursuant to Section 6046.5 shall receive, out of funds appropriated by the board for this purpose, fifty dollars ($50) per day for each day actually spent in the discharge of official duties, but in no event shall this payment exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per month. In addition, these public members shall receive, out of funds appropriated by the board, necessary expenses connected with the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 529, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

6029.

(a) The board may appoint such committees, officers and employees as it deems necessary or proper, and fix and pay salaries and necessary expenses.

(b) The members of the executive committee of the board shall include at least one board member appointed by each of the following appointing authorities:

(1) The Supreme Court.

(2) The Governor.

(3) The Speaker of the Assembly.

(4) The Senate Committee on
 Rules.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 422, Sec. 20.   (SB 36)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6030.

The board shall be charged with the executive function of the State Bar and the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter. The violation or threatened violation of any provision of Articles 7 (commencing with Section 6125) and 9 (commencing with Section 6150) of this chapter may be enjoined in a civil action brought in the superior court by the State Bar and no undertaking shall be required of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2033.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.

(a) The board may aid in all matters pertaining to the advancement of the science of jurisprudence or to the improvement of the administration of justice.

(b) Notwithstanding this section or any other law, the board shall not conduct or participate in, or authorize any committee, agency, employee, or commission of the State Bar to conduct or participate in any evaluation, review, or report on the qualifications, integrity, diligence, or judicial ability of any specific justice of a court provided for in Section 2 or 3 of Article VI of the California Constitution without prior review and statutory authorization by the Legislature.

The provisions of this subdivision shall not be
 construed to prohibit a licensee of the State Bar from conducting or participating in such an evaluation, review, or report in his or her individual capacity.

The provisions of this subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit an evaluation of potential judicial appointees or nominees as authorized by Section 12011.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 23.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.5.

(a) The California Lawyers Association and its activities shall not be funded with mandatory fees collected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 6140.

The State Bar may provide the California Lawyers Association with administrative and support services, provided the California Lawyers Association agrees, before such services are provided, to the nature, scope, and cost of those services. The State Bar shall be reimbursed for the full cost of those services out of funds collected pursuant to subdivision (b) or funds provided by the California Lawyers Association. The financial audit specified in Section 6145 shall confirm that the amount assessed by the State Bar for providing the services reimburses the costs of providing them, and shall verify that mandatory fees are not used to fund
 the California Lawyers Association. The State Bar and the California Lawyers Association may also contract for other services provided by the State Bar or by the California Lawyers Association.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Bar shall collect fees for the California Lawyers Association provided the Board of Trustees of the State Bar determines that the California Lawyers Association continues to serve a public purpose by providing the services described in subdivision (f) of Section 6056. The California Lawyers Association shall pay for the actual costs of the collection.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Bar is expressly authorized to collect, in conjunction with the State Bar’s collection of its annual license fees up to and through the collection of fees authorized for the year 2019, voluntary fees or donations on behalf of the
 Conference of Delegates of California Bar Associations, the independent nonprofit successor entity to the former Conference of Delegates of the State Bar which has been incorporated for the purposes of aiding in matters pertaining to the advancement of the science of jurisprudence or to the improvement of the administration of justice, and to convey any unexpended voluntary fees or donations previously made to the Conference of Delegates of the State Bar pursuant to this section to the Conference of Delegates of California Bar Associations. The Conference of Delegates of California Bar Associations shall pay for the cost of the collection. The State Bar and the Conference of Delegates of California Bar Associations may also contract for other services. The financial audit specified in Section 6145 shall confirm that the amount of any contract shall fully cover the costs of providing the services, and shall verify that mandatory fees are not used to fund any successor entity.

(2) The Conference of Delegates of California Bar Associations, which is the independent nonprofit successor entity to the former Conference of Delegates of the State Bar as referenced in paragraph (1), is a voluntary association, is not a part of the State Bar of California, and shall not be funded in any way through mandatory fees collected by the State Bar of California. Any contribution or membership option included with a State Bar of California mandatory fees billing statement shall include a statement that the Conference of Delegates of California Bar Associations is not a part of the State Bar of California and that membership in that organization is voluntary.

(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 227, Sec. 3.   (AB 3279)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6032.

Notwithstanding any other law, the State Bar is expressly authorized to collect, in conjunction with the State Bar’s collection of its annual license fees, voluntary fees on behalf of and for the purpose of funding the California Supreme Court Historical Society, which advances the science of jurisprudence by preserving and disseminating to the general public the history of the Supreme Court and the Judicial Branch.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 25.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6032.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, the State Bar is expressly authorized to collect, in conjunction with the State Bar’s collection of its annual license fees, voluntary donations on behalf of and for the purpose of funding California ChangeLawyers, which promotes a better justice system for all Californians.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 698, Sec. 6.   (SB 176)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6032.5.

(a) The Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Account is hereby established within the State Treasury.

(b) Funds from an IOLTA account that escheat to the state and are deposited into the Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Account pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1564.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, by the Student Aid Commission for the purpose of providing increased funding for, both the administration of and the provision of loan assistance pursuant to, the Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Program pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 69740) of Chapter 2 of Part 42
 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.   (SB 134)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6033.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Bar is expressly authorized to facilitate the professional responsibilities of licensees by collecting, in conjunction with the State Bar’s collection of its annual license fees or otherwise, voluntary financial support for nonprofit organizations that provide free legal services to persons of limited means. All funds received for programs related to this section shall be distributed to qualified legal services projects and support centers as provided in Section 6216 without deduction for administrative fees, costs, or expenses by the State Bar. Any fees, costs, or expenses associated with administering this section shall be absorbed within the costs allowed by and paid from the funds specified in Section 6216.

(b) To
 implement this section, the State Bar, in consultation with the Chief Justice of California, shall appoint a task force of key stakeholders to analyze the mechanisms and experience of bar associations that have adopted programs for the collection of financial contributions from bar licensees and shall propose an appropriate method for facilitating the collection and distribution of voluntary contributions that is best calculated to generate the greatest level of financial support and participation from State Bar licensees, taking into account such issues as the justice-gap between the legal needs of low-income people in California and the legal resources available to assist them. The method and any recommended voluntary contribution amount adopted by the Board of Trustees of the State Bar of California shall be implemented for the 2008 fiscal year, and shall be reviewed and adjusted as needed after two years and, thereafter, every five years as needed, in consultation with affected service providers and
 other key stakeholders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 26.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6034.

(a) The State Bar of California is authorized and directed to participate as a state agency in the Interagency Intercept Collections Program established pursuant to Section 12419.2 of the Government Code for the collection of any unpaid amounts owed to the State Bar of California, including any fine, penalty, assessment, cost, or reimbursement imposed under Section 6086.10, subdivision (c) of Section 6140.5, and any other applicable law. All funds received by the State Bar of California shall be allocated for the purposes established pursuant to Section 6033.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 227, Sec. 5.   (AB 3279)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6034.1.

(a) Any entity of the State Bar of California exploring a regulatory sandbox shall do all of the following:

(1) Prioritize protecting individuals, especially those in need of legal assistance, from unscrupulous actors, including those actors seeking to do business in the legal field, above all else.

(2) Prioritize increasing access to justice for persons who qualify for legal assistance from qualified legal services organizations or from State Department of Social Services-funded immigration legal services.

(3) Exclude corporate ownership of law firms and splitting legal fees with nonlawyers, which has
 historically been banned by common law and statute due to grave concerns that it could undermine consumer protection by creating conflicts of interests that are difficult to overcome and fundamentally infringe on the basic and paramount obligations of attorneys to their clients.

(4) Adhere to, and not propose any abrogation of, the restrictions on the unauthorized practice of law, including, but not limited to, Sections 13405 and 16951 of the Corporations Code.

(b) This section does not limit the State Bar’s ability to provide limited practice licenses to law students and law graduates under certain conditions, and with the supervision of an active State Bar-licensed attorney.

(c) This section does not limit the examination of the use of technology to increase access to justice for persons who qualify for legal
 assistance from qualified legal services organizations or from State Department of Social Services-funded immigration legal services, low-income individuals, and small businesses, so long as proposals adhere to, and do not propose any abrogation of, the restrictions on the unauthorized practice of law, including, but not limited to, Sections 13405 and 16951 of the Corporations Code.

(d) This section does not preclude the State Bar from seeking feedback from legal services organizations, including organizations that provide legal services in family law and immigration law, community-based organizations, and consumers about options for increasing access to legal services.

(e) The State Bar shall not expend any funds, regardless of the source, on activities that do not meet the requirements of this section.

(f) This
 section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 419, Sec. 4.   (AB 2958)   Effective September 18, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Conflicts of Interest [6035. - 6038.]

6035.

Unless the contrary is stated or clearly appears from the context, the definitions set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 82000) of Title 9 of the Government Code shall govern the interpretation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 752.)
-------------------------------------------

6036.

(a) Any member of the board of trustees shall disqualify themself from making, participating in the making of, or attempting to influence any decisions of the State Bar in which the member has a
 financial interest, as that term is defined in Section 87103 of the Government Code, that it is reasonably foreseeable may be affected materially by the decision.

(b) Any member of the board of trustees shall likewise disqualify themself when there exists a personal interest that may prevent the member from applying disinterested skill and undivided loyalty to the State Bar in making or participating in the making of decisions.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), no member shall be prevented from making or participating in the making of any decision to the extent that the member’s participation is legally required for the action or decision to be made. The fact that a member’s vote is needed to break a tie does not make the member’s participation legally required for the purposes of this section.

(d) A member required to disqualify
 themself because of a conflict of interest shall (1) immediately disclose the interest, (2) withdraw from any participation in the matter, (3) refrain from attempting to influence another member, and (4) refrain from voting. It is sufficient for the purpose of this section that the member indicate only that the member has a disqualifying financial or personal interest.

(e) For purposes of this article and unless otherwise specified, “member” means any appointed or elected member of the board of trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 10.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6037.

No action or decision of the State Bar shall be invalid because of the participation therein by a member or members of the board of trustees in violation of Section 6036. However, any member who intentionally violates the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 6036 is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding five days, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both, and, if the member is an attorney member of the board, a certified copy of the record of
 conviction shall be transmitted to the Supreme Court for disposition as provided in Sections 6101 and 6102. Upon entry of final judgment of conviction, the member’s term of office on the board of trustees, and duties and authority incidental thereto, shall automatically terminate. Any member who intentionally violates the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 6036 shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction brought in the name of the state only by a district attorney of a county in which the member resides or maintains offices and the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 11.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6038.

Attorney members of the Judicial Council, members of the Commission on Judicial Performance who are not judges, and employees designated in the Conflict of Interest Code of the State Bar of California are subject to provisions of this article with respect to making, participating in the making, or attempting to influence, governmental decisions of their respective state agencies other than decisions of a judicial or quasi-judicial nature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 727.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Investigations, Examining Committee, Subpoenas, and Other Proceedings  [6043.5. - 6054.]

6043.5.

(a) Every person who reports to the State Bar or causes a complaint to be filed with the State Bar that an attorney has engaged in professional misconduct, knowing the report or complaint to be false and malicious, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) The State Bar may, in its discretion, notify the appropriate district attorney or city attorney that a person has filed what the State Bar believes to be a false and malicious report or complaint against an attorney and recommend prosecution of the person under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1639, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6044.

The chief trial counsel, with or without the filing or presentation of any complaint, may initiate and conduct investigations of all matters affecting or relating to:

(a) The discipline of the licensees of the State Bar.

(b) The acts or practices of a person whom the chief trial counsel has reason to believe has violated or is about to violate any provision of Articles 7 (commencing with Section 6125) and 9 (commencing with Section 6150) of this chapter.

(c) Any other matter within the jurisdiction of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 32.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6044.5.

(a) When an investigation or formal proceeding concerns alleged misconduct which may subject a licensee to criminal prosecution for any felony, or any lesser crime committed during the course of the practice of law, or in any manner that the client of the licensee was a victim, or may subject the licensee to disciplinary charges in another jurisdiction, the State Bar shall disclose, in confidence, information not otherwise public under this chapter to the appropriate agency responsible for criminal or disciplinary enforcement or exchange that information with that agency.

(b) The Chief Trial Counsel or designee may disclose, in confidence, information not otherwise public under this chapter as follows:

(1) To government agencies responsible for enforcement of civil and criminal laws or for professional licensing of individuals.

(2) To members of the Judicial Nominees Evaluation Commission or a review committee thereof as to matters concerning nominees in any jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 33.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6046.

The board may establish an examining committee having the power:

(a) To examine all applicants for admission to practice law.

(b) To administer the requirements for admission to practice law.

(c) To certify to the Supreme Court for admission those applicants who fulfill the requirements provided in this chapter.

The examining committee shall be comprised of 19 members, 10 of whom shall be licensees of the State Bar or judges of courts of record in this state and nine of whom shall be public members who have never been licensees of the State Bar or admitted to practice before any
 court in the United States. At least one of the attorney members shall have been admitted to practice law in this state within three years from the date of the member’s appointment to the examining committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 35.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6046.2.

(a) On or before November 30, 2026, the Committee of Bar Examiners shall provide a report to the board of trustees, the Chief Justice of the California Supreme Court, and to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Judiciary pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code on whether adopting a uniform bar examination, including, but not limited to, the National Conference of Bar Examiners’ Uniform Bar Examination or any successor or replacement of that exam, would be
 more efficient to administer and lower the cost of administration for the State Bar and examinees.

(b) This section is repealed on January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 155, Sec. 1.   (AB 484)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6046.5.

Three of the public members of the examining committee shall be appointed by the Senate Rules Committee, three of the public members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, and three of the public members shall be appointed by the Governor. They shall serve for a term of four years, except that of the initial public members so appointed, two shall serve for two years and four shall serve for four years, as shall be determined by lot. The public members appointed pursuant to the amendment of this section during the 1987–88 Regular Session of the Legislature shall serve for four years. The public members shall have the same rights, powers, and privileges as any attorney member except that such a member shall not participate in the drafting of questions submitted to applicants on the California bar
 examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 36.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6046.6.

(a) (1) (A) The Committee of Bar Examiners shall not alter the bar examination in a manner that requires the substantial modification of the training or preparation required for passage of the examination, except after giving two years’ notice of that change.

(B) This requirement does not apply to a change in the bar examination that is applicable only at the option of the applicant.

(2) The Committee of Bar Examiners shall not change the vendor or creator of the multiple choice questions except after giving 18 months’ notice of that change. This paragraph shall not apply to the vendor of multiple choice questions used for the July 2025 bar examination.

(3) The Committee of Bar Examiners shall not authorize a remote administration of the bar examination except after giving two years’ notice of that change.

(b) The Committee of Bar Examiners shall communicate and cooperate with the Law School Council and deans, or their designees, of law schools approved by the American Bar Association or the Committee of Bar Examiners.

(c) Scaling may be used on the bar examination for the purpose of maintaining an examination of uniform difficulty from year to year.

(d) (1) Any alteration to the bar examination that constitutes either of the following shall require at least 120 days notice:

(A) Changes that affect the user experience
 with testing software.

(B) Changes to the medium in which testing materials are provided.

(2) The notice requirement shall not apply to updates to the software necessary for any of the following:

(A) To satisfy bar examination security requirements.

(B) To ensure compatibility with new or updates to operating systems, chipsets, or hardware.

(C) To comply with web content accessibility guidelines or otherwise make the software more accessible.

(D) To improve efficiency of the system architecture.

(3) The notice requirement shall not apply to a change in the bar
 examination that is applicable only at the option of the applicant.

(e) The Committee of Bar Examiners shall provide notice if artificial intelligence is used in creating questions for the bar examination or grading of the bar examination. 

(f) The changes made to subdivision (a) by the act that added this subdivision are to apply to any changes made from the July 2025 bar examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 405, Sec. 4.   (SB 253)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6046.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the examining committee shall be responsible for the approval, regulation, and oversight of degree-granting unaccredited law schools that meet both of the following:

(1) Award the juris doctor (J.D.) professional degree in California.
